Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB868.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 71 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a part to read:PART XXXSTATE-OWNED ELECTRONIC DEVICES AND NETWORKSChapter71. (Reserved)73. (Reserved)75. Preservation of RecordsCHAPTER 71(Reserved)CHAPTER 73(Reserved)CHAPTER 75PRESERVATION OF RECORDS12345678910111213141516171819 Sec.7501. Definitions.7502. Prohibition.§ 7501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Government." The term shall have the same meaning as the term "Commonwealth government" under 2 Pa.C.S. § 101 (relating to definitions)."Government-owned electronic device." A device with the capacity to install, maintain or update an application, software or other technology that prevents the device from maintaining or preserving a record as required under law, under express control, ownership or operation of:(1) the government;(2) a political subdivision of the government; or(3) a local education agency."Local education agency." As defined under section 220(c) of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949.§ 7502. Prohibition.(a) General rule.--A government-owned electronic device may not have an application, software or other technology downloaded, installed or accessed that is configured to prevent the government-owned electronic device from maintaining or preserving a record as required by law.(b) Exception.--Subsection (a) shall not apply to law enforcement activities, security interests, security research or risk mitigation actions where the application, software or other 20250SB0868PN0963 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 technology may be required. If the application, software or other technology is required, the application, software or other technology may not be used to prevent the creation, maintenance or preservation of a record as required by law.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0868PN0963 - 3 - 12345